src/ParadigmFeatures/MorphAnimacy/GetMorphAnimacy.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Anim +Inan

LEXICON Root
Lemma;
<?*> 	Suffix;

LEXICON Lemma
пол			Inan;
со́рок		Inan;
мно́го		Inan;
немно́го		Inan;
сто́лько		Inan;
ско́лько		Inan;
не́сколько	Inan;
он			Anim;
ка́ждый		Anim;
лю́бой		Anim;
друг_дру́га	Anim;
мы			Anim;
вы			Anim;
они́			Anim;
вы			Anim;
не́которые	Anim;
мно́гие		Anim;
немно́гие	Anim;
пять		Inan;
шесть		Inan;
семь		Inan;
во́семь		Inan;
де́вять		Inan;
де́сять		Inan;
две́сти      Inan;
ты́сяча		Inan;
я			Anim;
ты			Anim;
она			Anim;
себя́		Anim;
что			Inan;
ничто́		Inan;
не́что		Inan;
не́кто		Inan;
не́чего		Inan;
ма́ло		Inan;
нема́ло		Inan;
всё			Inan;
мно́гое		Inan;
немно́гое	Inan;
вся́кое		Inan;
про́чее		Inan;
остально́е	Inan;
девяно́сто	Inan;
сто			Inan;
полтора́ста	Inan;
три́ста		Inan;
четы́реста	Inan;
оно́			Anim;
кто			Anim;
никто́		Anim;
не́кого		Anim;

LEXICON Suffix
дцать		Inan;
десят		Inan;
деся́т		Inan;
со́т			Inan;

LEXICON Anim
+Anim		#;

LEXICON Inan
+Inan		#;
